Hawaii statutes.
[§667-40] Use of power of sale foreclosure
in certain non-mortgage situations. A power of sale foreclosure under this
part may be used in certain non-mortgage situations where a law or a written
document contains, authorizes, permits, or provides for a power of sale, a
power of sale foreclosure, a power of sale remedy, or a nonjudicial
foreclosure. These laws or written documents are limited to those involving
time share plans, condominium property regimes, and agreements of sale. [L
1998, c 122, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next